Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 38 Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Social Workers and Chemical Dependency Specialists

Law as it existed prior to 1993 amendments is controlling. —

The mandatory licensure provisions under §

33-38-110

, the prerequisites to licensure found in §

33-38-106

, and the licensure exemptions set forth in §

33-38-103

violate guarantees of equal protection under art. 1, §§ 2 and 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.; these provisions must be stricken as contrary to guarantees of equal protection, the guarantee of uniform operation of laws, and as special legislation. The unconstitutional provisions are of no effect, and the law in the form it existed prior to the 1993 amendments is controlling. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

Act violates equal protection. —

Under the Mental Health Professions Practice Act, private counselors rights to equal protection have been transgressed; none of the evidence demonstrates that supervision by public, licensed counselors results in the qualification of counselors who are more competent or more ethical and, thus, more likely to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. The differentiation of the public employer or the charitable employer from the private, for-profit employer cannot be justified as a proper classification and, thus, is not a legitimate exercise in police power. This classification is not founded on a reasonable basis, is arbitrary, and constitutes unwarranted discrimination. It is a violation of equal protection and must be set aside. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Social worker malpractice, 58 ALR4th 977.

Cause of action for clergy malpractice, 75 ALR4th 750.

§ 33-38-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Mental Health Professions Practice Act”.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

§ 33-38-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the mental health professions licensing board;

“Mental health procedures” means engaging in methods and techniques which include, but are not restricted to:

“Counseling” means assisting clients through the counseling relationship, using a combination of mental health, psychotherapy and human development principles, methods and techniques, to achieve mental, emotional, physical, social, moral, educational, spiritual or career development and adjustment through the life span, but shall not include religious instruction;

“Appraisal” means selecting, administering, scoring and interpreting instruments designed to assess an individual’s attitudes, abilities, achievements, interests and personal characteristics and the use of methods and techniques for understanding human behavior in relation to coping with, adapting to, or changing life situations;

“Consulting” means the application of scientific principles and procedures in counseling and human development to provide assistance in understanding and solving current or potential problems that the client may have in relation to a third party, be it an individual, a group or an organization;

“Referral” means evaluating and identifying needs of a client to determine the advisability of referral to other specialists, informing the client of such judgment and communicating as requested or deemed appropriate to such referral sources;

“Research” means systematic efforts to collect, evaluate, interpret and apply procedures related to improving the understanding and delivery of counseling services to clients.

“Licensed professional counselor, (LPC), licensed marriage and family therapist, (LMFT), licensed clinical social worker, (LCSW) and licensed addictions therapist, (LAT),” mean persons who represent themselves to the public by any title or description of psychotherapy services incorporating the words “professional counselor”, “marriage and family therapist”, “clinical social worker”, or “addictions therapist”, who offer to render professional services in these fields to individuals, groups, organizations, corporations, institutions, government agencies, or the general public for compensation, implying that they are licensed and trained, experienced or expert in one (1) or more of these fields of practice and who hold a valid license to engage in the practice of one (1) or more of these specializations. These persons may practice independent of supervision;

“Practice of addictions therapy” means providing services based on theory and methods of counseling, psychotherapy, and addictionology to persons who are experiencing cognitive, affective or behavioral psychosocial dysfunction as a direct or indirect result of addiction, chemical dependency, abuse of chemical substances or related disorders. The practice of addictions therapy includes, but is not limited to, addiction prevention, crisis intervention, diagnosis, referral, direct treatment, and follow-up treatment which is rendered to individuals, families, groups, organizations, schools and communities who are adversely affected by addictions or related disorders;

“Practice of clinical social work” means applying social work theory and methods to the diagnosis, treatment and prevention of psychosocial dysfunction, disability or impairment, including emotional and mental disorders. It is based on knowledge of one (1) or more theories of human development within a psychosocial context. The perspective of person-in-situation is central to professional social work practice. Professional clinical social work includes but is not limited to interventions directed to interpersonal interactions, intrapsychic dynamics, and life support and management issues. Professional clinical social work services consist of assessment, diagnosis, treatment, including psychotherapy and counseling, client-centered advocacy, consultation and evaluation with individuals, families, groups, communities and organizations;

“Practice of counseling” means rendering to individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, corporations, institutions, government agencies or the general public a service that integrates a wellness, pathology and multicultural model of human behavior. This model applies a combination of mental health, psychotherapeutic, and human development principles and procedures to help clients achieve effective mental, emotional, physical, social, moral, educational, spiritual or career development and adjustment throughout the life span, and includes the diagnostic description and treatment of mental disorders or disabilities within the range of the professional’s preparation;

“Practice of marriage and family therapy” means the rendering of professional marital and family therapy services and treatment to individuals, family groups and marital pairs, singly or in groups. Marital and family therapy includes but is not limited to the diagnosis and treatment, including psychotherapy, of nervous, emotional, and mental disorders, whether cognitive, affective or behavioral, within the context of marital and family systems. Marital and family therapy involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, marital pairs and families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental disorders;

“Psychotherapy” means the treatment, diagnosis, testing, assessment or counseling in a professional relationship to assist individuals or groups to alleviate mental disorders, understand unconscious or conscious motivation, resolve emotional relationships, or attitudinal conflicts, or modify behaviors which interfere with effective emotional, social or intellectual functioning;

“Use of title or description of” means to hold oneself out to the public as having a particular status by means of stating on signs, mailboxes, address plates, stationery, announcements, calling cards or other instruments of professional identification;

Certified addictions practitioner (CAP) means a person certified under this act to practice addictions treatment, prevention, intervention, diagnosis, referral and follow up under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in the state of Wyoming;

Certified social worker (CSW) means a person certified under this act to perform social work treatment, prevention, intervention, case management, referral and follow up with individuals diagnosed with mental illnesses or mental disorders under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in the state of Wyoming;

Certified mental health worker (CMHW) means a person certified under this act to perform the application of human services or psychological theory and methods to the assessment, treatment or prevention of psychosocial dysfunction, disability or impairment, including emotional or mental disorders, under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in the state of Wyoming. The practice of a CMHW shall not include assigning a diagnosis or acting as a primary treatment provider;

“Qualified clinical supervisor” means a licensed professional counselor, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed addictions therapist, licensed psychologist, a licensed psychiatrist, licensed physician with specialty in addictionology or a licensed advanced practitioner of nursing with psychiatric specialty;

“This act” means W.S.

33-38-101

through

33-38-113

;

“Domicile” means that place where a person has his true, fixed and permanent home to which whenever the person is absent the person has the intention of returning;

“Certified addictions practitioner assistant” means a person certified under this act to assist in the practice of addictions treatment, prevention, intervention, referral and followup under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in the state of Wyoming;

“Human behavioral discipline” refers to a degree in addictionology, chemical dependency, substance use disorder, counseling, psychology, social work, sociology or a related field.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, § 2; 1997, ch. 153, § 1; 2001, ch. 111, § 1; ch. 204, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 301; 2021 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xiv), substituted “33-38-113” for “33-38-112.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote (a)(xii), which read, "Certified mental health worker (CMHW) means a person certified under this act to perform mental health procedures under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in the state of Wyoming"; and added (a)(xvii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Rejected applicant's course work not “primarily psychological.” —

Where the evidence showed the applicant had 20 hours of credit in psychology and psychology-related courses which represented roughly 30% of his total course work, the board was correct in finding applicant's doctoral program was not “primarily psychological” in nature and that this requirement was substantially different from the Illinois requirements under which he had been licensed. If the Wyoming board were to license the appellant based upon the law in Illinois, it would be tantamount to abdicating its authority to license applicants in Wyoming under Wyoming law. Sellers v. Wyoming Bd. of Psychologist Examiners, 739 P.2d 125,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 465

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under former § 33-27-106).

Denial of re-licensure proper. —

Where appellant was denied re-licensure of his clinical social work license under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-110(c), the Wyoming Mental Health Professions Licensing Board was not required to present expert testimony that appellant violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-102(a)(iii) and (v) by representing himself as a clinical social worker and practicing clinical social work without a license because the re-licensure was denied on the grounds that appellant violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-110(a)(i) and (c)(iii), the Board meticulously detailed in its order the applicable statutory and administrative standards. In re Licensure of Jerry Penny v. State ex rel. Wyo. Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 2005 WY 117, 120 P.3d 152,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 33-38-103.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to apply to the activities and services of:

Qualified members of other legally recognized professions who are otherwise licensed or certified by this state, such as physicians, psychologists or registered nurses, from performing services consistent with the laws of this state, their training and the code of ethics of their professions, provided they do not represent themselves to be practicing the professions regulated under this act and do not represent themselves to be professional counselors, clinical social workers, marriage and family therapists or addiction therapists, or certified social workers, certified addictions practitioners or certified mental health workers;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 153, § 2.

A student pursuing a course of study in these professions in an accredited institution of higher education if these activities are performed under clinical supervision and constitute a part of the supervised course of study, provided that such a person be designated a “student”;

Nonresidents who render services in this state for not more than thirty (30) days during any calendar year, provided that the persons are duly authorized to perform the activities and services under the laws of the state or county of the person’s residency;

A rabbi, priest, minister, clergy or any person acting as a lay religious counselor of any religious denomination or sect provided the activities and services are within the scope of the performance of regular or specialized ministerial duties, the counseling is clearly identified as being based on religious principles and there is no fee for services regulated under this act. This paragraph does not preclude acceptance of donations of any kind;

Persons offering unpaid volunteer services for organizations or charities provided that these persons are approved by the organizations or agencies for whom the services are rendered;

School social workers and school counselors certified under the professional teaching standards board when employed by local school districts.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 181, § 3.

Nothing in this act shall prevent a qualified person exempted by this section from being licensed or certified under this act.

Nothing in this act shall prevent persons who are not licensed or certified under this act from providing nonclinical case management services to assist the client. Case management services include advocacy, crisis intervention, linkage, monitoring and followup and referral. For purposes of this subsection:

“Advocacy” means advocacy on behalf of a specific client for the purpose of accessing needed services;

“Crisis intervention” means intervention and stabilization provided in situations requiring immediate action or resolution for a specific client. The case manager may provide the initial intervention in a crisis situation and assist the client in gaining access to other needed clinical crisis intervention;

“Linkage” means working with clients or service providers to secure access to services. Activities include making telephone calls to agencies to arrange appointments or services following the initial referral process and preparing clients for appointments;

“Monitoring and followup” means contacting the client or others to ensure that a client is following a prescribed service plan and monitoring the progress and impact of that plan;

“Referral” means arranging initial appointments with service providers or informing clients of services available and addresses and telephone numbers of agencies providing services.

Nothing in this act shall prevent persons who are not licensed or certified under this act from advising or directing an individual regarding the conduct and behavior required as a participant of a program or system.

Nothing in this act shall prevent persons who are not licensed or certified under this act from providing facilitation, leadership or instruction in educational programs addressing behaviors or life skills. This subsection shall not apply to persons providing facilitation, leadership or instruction to persons in the custody of the department of corrections unless the persons in custody have been subjected to mental health screening.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 153, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 204, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

Section's provisions violate equal protection. —

The mandatory licensure provisions under §

33-38-110

, the prerequisites to licensure found in §

33-38-106

, and the licensure exemptions set forth in this section violate guarantees of equal protection under art. 1, §§ 2 and 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.; these provisions must be stricken as contrary to guarantees of equal protection, the guarantee of uniform operation of laws, and as special legislation. The unconstitutional provisions are of no effect, and the law in the form it existed prior to the 1993 amendments is controlling. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

§ 33-38-104.
Board created; expenses.

The board is created and shall consist of six (6) members, residents of the state of Wyoming for a minimum of one (1) year, who shall be appointed by the governor by and with the consent of the senate.

Four (4) board members shall be licensed under this act, one (1) from each discipline and two (2) members shall be from the public at large. The governor shall through appointments to the board ensure that appointees are adult citizens and that differences in gender, ethnic origin, and the various levels of graduate and professional degrees and specialties, are represented on the board, though not all such differences will necessarily be reflected at the same time in board membership. Board members representing the professional disciplines shall have at least four (4) years of experience in the discipline. When the term of each member of the board ends, the governor shall appoint a successor by and with the consent of the senate for a term of three (3) years. Any licensed member vacancy occurring on the board shall be filled by the governor from a list of eligible candidates submitted by that affiliated discipline whose position is vacant. Public at large vacancies shall be filled at the pleasure of the governor.

The initial board shall be made up of persons engaged in full-time practice or teaching in the disciplines involved and who are eligible for licensure under this act. When the initial appointments are made to the board by the governor, two (2) members shall serve a one (1) year term, two (2) members shall serve two (2) year terms and two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms as designated by the governor.

The members of the board shall be paid mileage and per diem as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii) when engaged in performing their duties as members of the board.

The board shall submit an annual report to the governor as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, § 2; 1997, ch. 153, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (d), substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowance as allowed to state employees.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

§ 33-38-105.
Powers and duties of the board; rules; meetings; fees.

The board shall adopt rules not inconsistent with this act or the laws of this state that are reasonable and necessary to administer this act. A subcommittee from each discipline shall be requested to draft the recommended rules and regulations for that particular discipline and shall submit them to the full board for action. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§

16-3-101

et seq.].

The board shall meet not later than thirty (30) days after its members are appointed by the governor. The board shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson and a secretary-treasurer who shall hold office according to the rules adopted by the board.

The board shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each year and any special meetings that are properly called as provided by the rules adopted by the board. Four (4) members constitute a quorum.

The board shall conduct hearings on complaints concerning violations of this act and the rules adopted under this act. The initial inquiry will be conducted by a subcommittee, appointed by the board, composed of members of the discipline in question which will make recommendations to the board for action.

The board may, in its own name, proceed in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin and restrain any unlicensed person from violating this act and may similarly act to bring suit to prevent or remedy any other violation of this act or of the rules adopted under this act. The action is in addition to any other proceeding or remedy authorized by law. The board shall be represented in all such actions by the attorney general or private counsel may be secured with approval of the attorney general.

The board may charge an application fee and fees for examinations, licensing, certification, specialty examination designation, renewal and other services provided in amounts established by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. All money received, and the interest thereon, shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of a separate account and may be used only for the administration of this act.

No member of the board is liable for any act performed in good faith for the performance of duties set forth in this act.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

The board shall request criminal history background information as authorized under W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xxxiv) on license and certificate applicants for:

All initial applicants; and

All renewal applicants once every four (4) years.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 1993, ch. 181, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; ch. 153, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2021 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked fund” in (f).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (j).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”